Wisconsin, session 2025, AB587.
do enact as follows:AB587,11Section 1. 100.172 of the statutes is created to read:AB587,2,32100.172 Requirements for the sale or resale of entertainment tickets. 3(1) Definitions. In this section:AB587,2,74(a) “Entertainment” means all forms of diversion, recreation, or show, 5including theatrical or operatic performances, concerts, motion pictures, 6entertainment at fairgrounds or amusement parks, or athletic or sport 7competitions.AB587,2,98(b) “Entertainment ticket” means a ticket to a place of entertainment in this 9state.AB587,2,1410(c) “Online ticket marketplace” means the administrator of a website or other 11electronic service that sells tickets or maintains a platform to facilitate the sale of 12tickets. “Online ticket marketplace” includes an agent, employee, or assignee of an 13administrator of a website or other electronic service that sells tickets or maintains 14a platform to facilitate the sale of tickets.AB587,2,1615(d) “Operator” means a person that does any of the following or an agent, 16employee, or assignee of a person that does any of the following:AB587,2,17171. Owns, operates, or controls a place of entertainment.AB587,2,18182. Produces entertainment.AB587,2,19193. Sells for original sale an entertainment ticket.AB587,3,81(e) “Ticket reseller” means a person that, for a commercial purpose, sells for 2resale an entertainment ticket after the original sale of the ticket, including an 3operator if the operator sells for resale an entertainment ticket after the original 4sale of the ticket. “Ticket reseller” does not mean a person that sells an 5entertainment ticket for resale if the person purchased the ticket solely for the 6person’s own use or the use of the person’s invitee, employee, or agent. “Ticket 7reseller” does not include any person that makes less than $10,000 in annual 8revenue from the resale of entertainment tickets.AB587,3,129(2) Price transparency requirements. (a) An operator, ticket reseller, or 10online ticket marketplace shall at all times while listing the sale of a ticket to a 11place of entertainment and during a ticket purchasing process disclose in dollars 12and in an easily readable and conspicuous manner all of the following information:AB587,3,14131. The total ticket price, including all fees and surcharges that must be paid in 14order to purchase the ticket.AB587,3,16152. The portion of the total ticket price that is a fee or surcharge that 16represents a service charge.AB587,3,18173. The amount and description of any fee or surcharge charged as a portion of 18the total ticket price.AB587,4,219(b) In disclosing any fee or surcharge that is part of the total ticket price as 20required under par. (a), or the subtotal of any fee or surcharge, the disclosure may 21not be false, misleading, or presented as equally prominent to or more prominent 22than the total ticket price. The disclosure of any fee or surcharge that makes up the 1total ticket price may be displayed in a manner that allows a person purchasing a 2ticket to hide or minimize the fees or surcharges.AB587,4,113(c) An operator, ticket reseller, or online ticket marketplace may not increase 4the price of a ticket with respect to a particular person after the ticket and its price 5are first displayed to the person, except that a reasonable fee for the delivery of a 6nonelectronic ticket may be added to the price of the ticket if a person purchasing a 7nonelectronic ticket has chosen to receive the ticket via a nonelectronic, physical 8delivery method selected by the person. The operator, ticket reseller, or online ticket 9marketplace shall disclose the price of any nonelectronic, physical delivery method 10selected by a ticket purchaser to the ticket purchaser prior to the purchase of the 11ticket.AB587,4,1512(3) Ticket resale restrictions. No ticket reseller may sell for resale an 13entertainment ticket for more than the face value of the ticket unless the ticket 14reseller has received prior authorization for the resale from the operator of the 15event for which the ticket was originally sold.AB587,4,1816(4) Penalties. An operator, ticket reseller, or online ticket marketplace that 17violates sub. (2) or (3) shall be subject to a forfeiture of $1,000 for each violation and 18shall forfeit all profits made from ticket sales that violate sub. (2) or (3).AB587,4,1919